Nebraska, session 109, LB221.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB221 LB221
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 50-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
50-1301 (1) The Legislature finds that state government actions have
produced an increase in the numbers of boards, commissions, and similar
entities that support, advise, direct, or administer various state
programs. The process has evolved without sufficient legislative and
executive oversight and without a system of checks and balances. Because
the Legislature is responsible for the expenditure of public money and
the shaping of the administration of state government and is held
accountable for fiscal policy, the Legislature should also be responsible
for the termination, continuation, or modification of such boards,
commissions, and similar entities so that it may be assured that its
directives have been faithfully carried out.
(2) The Legislature further finds that boards, commissions, and
similar entities cannot function as intended when vacancies on the board,
commission, or similar entity are left unfilled. Membership on these
entities is often required by statute to be appointed by either the
Governor or the Legislature. In the case of a gubernatorial appointment
for a seat that has been vacant for six months or more, the legislative
committee of jurisdiction may take applications for the seat and forward
recommendations to the Governor for possible appointment. If the seat
remains vacant for another three months after the date recommendations
are forwarded to the Governor, the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council may make the appointment.
Sec. 2. Original section 50-1301, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-